Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.020

Supervision of markets and special open consignment horse sales—Rules—Interference with director's duties.

Public livestock markets and special open consignment horse sales shall be under the direction and supervision of the director, and the director may adopt those rules as are necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter. It shall be the duty of the director to enforce and carry out the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. No person shall interfere with the director when he or she is performing or carrying out any duties imposed by this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

[ 2003 c 326 s 64; 1983 c 298 s 5; 1959 c 107 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.